North Carolina statutes. Chapter 66. Commerce and Business.
Article 44. Free Insurance.

§ 66-380.
Definitions.

As used in this Article:

“Consumer goods” means goods that are used primarily for personal, family, or household purposes. For the purposes of this Article, consumer goods do not include automobiles or residences.

“Free insurance” means any of the following:

Insurance for which no identifiable or additional charge is made to the purchaser or lessee of consumer goods or services directly or indirectly connected with the purchase of consumer goods.

Insurance for which an identifiable or additional charge is made in an amount less than the cost of such insurance as to the seller, lessor, or other person other than the insurer providing the insurance.

History.

2008-124, s. 9.1.

§ 66-381.
Free insurance.

No person shall advertise, offer, or provide free insurance for damage, loss, or theft as an inducement to the purchase, sale, or rental of consumer goods or services directly or indirectly connected with the purchase of consumer goods.

History.

2008-124, s. 9.1.

§ 66-382.
Unfair trade practice.

A violation of

G.S. 66-381

constitutes an unfair trade practice under

G.S. 75-1.1

.

History.

2008-124, s. 9.1.